Wyoming, session 2025, HB0259.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1.
(a) This section shall consist of funds appropriated
for K-12 school building and facility needs.
(b) As used in this section a "priority" identified
by an Arabic numeral means the project ranking as submitted
by the school facilities commission within its budget
recommendations provided under W.S. 21-15-119.
(c) Each amount appropriated from the public school
foundation program account for a school facility project
under subsection (g) of this section shall remain in effect
from the effective date of the appropriation until that
project is completed, unless otherwise provided by law.
Upon completion of a project specified in subsection (g) of
this section, any unexpended, unobligated funds remaining
from the appropriation for the project shall revert to the
public school foundation program account.
(d) An estimated schedule for deploying projects
funded by this act, as adopted by the school facilities
commission and as contained within the 2025-2026 biennial
budget, inclusive of the supplemental budget request,
submitted by the commission under W.S. 21-15-119, and
further refined by the final, corrected budget submitted by
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0259
ENROLLED ACT NO. 75, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
the governor's office, shall be used by the state
construction department to the extent practicable to guide
expenditure of appropriated funds, subject to restrictions
contained in W.S. 21-15-119(c). The estimated schedule
shall be based upon information, processes, events and
expenditures and shall not be binding upon the state
construction department or the school facilities
commission.
(e) Amounts appropriated under subsection (g) of this
section or included in the budget requests submitted by the
school facilities commission or the governor's office shall
not be construed to be an entitlement or guaranteed amount
and shall be expended by the school facilities commission
to ensure adequate, efficient and the most cost effective
school buildings and facilities in accordance with W.S.
21-15-114(a)(vii) and 21-15-117(b) that are contained in
school district facility plans as required by W.S.
21-15-116.
(f) In addition to accounting and reporting
requirements imposed under W.S. 28-11-301(c)(iv), the state
construction department shall report monthly on the
deployment of amounts to fund projects under this section
in accordance with the deployment schedule, information on
project progression and, if applicable, the rationale for
any deviation from the estimated schedule. The reports
shall be submitted by the department to the select
committee on school facilities, the joint appropriations
committee and the governor.
(g) The following amounts are appropriated from the
public school foundation program account to the school
facilities commission for the following purposes:
2

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0259
ENROLLED ACT NO. 75, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(i) For the following component level major
maintenance projects, twenty-nine million eight hundred
thirty-two thousand seven hundred sixteen dollars
($29,832,716.00):
School
Priority District Project
2-1 Sublette #1 High School
2-2 Converse #1 High School
2-3 Sublette #9 Elementary School
2-4 Campbell #1 Elementary School
2-5 Platte #1 High School
2-6 Sheridan #2 High School
2-7 Uinta #1 Middle School
2-8 Fremont #14 High School
2-9 Hot Springs #1 Elementary School
2-10 Johnson #1 K-12 School
2-11 Converse #1 Elementary School
2-12 Big Horn #3 Elementary School
2-13 Converse #2 Intermediate School
2-14 Uinta #6 Intermediate School
2-15 Goshen #1 High School
2-16 Platte #1 Elementary School
2-17 Sheridan #2 Elementary School
(ii) For the following school facility projects
in Campbell county school district #1:
(A) For construction and demolition of a
transportation facility ancillary building, fourteen
million four hundred seventy-three thousand two hundred
twenty-four dollars ($14,473,224.00). Any disposition or
demolition of buildings or facilities necessary for the
completion of the transportation facility ancillary
3

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0259
ENROLLED ACT NO. 75, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
building under this subparagraph shall be subject to
commission approval and be included in the district's
facility plan to ensure the disposition or demolition is in
the financial interest of the state and is in the public
interest as required under W.S. 21-15-123(f)(vi);
(B) For design, construction, site
preparation and demolition for a high school building and
facility, in addition to funds previously appropriated for
design pursuant to 2024 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 118,
Section 313(j)(iii), twenty million dollars
($20,000,000.00). The amounts appropriated under this
subparagraph shall remain in effect from the effective date
of this act until the high school building and facility is
complete. Upon completion of the high school building and
facility, any unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from
this appropriation shall revert to the public school
foundation program account as provided under subsection (c)
of this section;
(C) Effective March 15, 2026, for
construction and demolition of a high school building and
facility, in addition to funds appropriated under
subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, one hundred thirty
million eight hundred eighty-four thousand five hundred
twenty-eight dollars ($130,884,528.00). The amounts
appropriated under this subparagraph shall remain in effect
from March 15, 2026, until the high school building and
facility project is complete. Upon completion of the high
school building and facility project, any unexpended,
unobligated funds remaining from this appropriation shall
revert to the public school foundation program account as
provided under subsection (c) of this section. Any
disposition or demolition of buildings or facilities
necessary for the completion of the high school building
4

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0259
ENROLLED ACT NO. 75, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
and facility pursuant this subparagraph and subparagraph
(B) of this paragraph shall be subject to commission
approval and be included in the district's facility plan to
ensure the disposition or demolition is in the financial
interest of the state and is in the public interest as
required under W.S. 21-15-123(f)(vi).
(iii) For unanticipated costs associated with
the projects funded under this subsection, eleven million
seven hundred eleven thousand four hundred twenty‑eight
dollars ($11,711,428.00).
(h) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, of
the unexpended, obligated monies appropriated from the
school capital construction account to the school
facilities commission under 2023 Wyoming Session Laws,
Chapter 94, Section 313(j)(xiii), up to thirteen million
four hundred thousand dollars ($13,400,000.00), or as much
thereof as is available, shall not revert upon completion
of the projects pursuant to 2023 Wyoming Session Laws,
Chapter 94, Section 313(d), and are hereby reappropriated
to the school facilities commission to supplement previous
appropriations for inflationary costs associated with
projects approved by the commission and funded by the
legislature. The original scope and design of the projects
for which these funds are expended shall not be modified as
a result of the expenditure of the funds reappropriated
under this subsection. This reappropriation shall not be
transferred or expended for any other purpose. The
commission shall report the expenditure of funds
reappropriated under this subsection in the manner required
under subsection (f) of this section.
(j) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the
school facilities division of the state construction
5

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0259
ENROLLED ACT NO. 75, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
department and the school facilities commission shall study
whether the state construction department should direct
expenditures for all major building and facility repair and
replacement under W.S. 21-15-109, including authorizing and
supervising the major maintenance projects for all K-12
public school facilities across Wyoming. As part of this
study, the school facilities division of the state
construction department shall analyze the potential impacts
on the agency and school districts that received funding
for construction for any building and facility projects for
the period beginning July 1, 2022, and ending June 30,
2026. Not later than October 1, 2025, and each October 1
thereafter until October 1, 2031, the school facilities
division of the state construction department and the
school facilities commission shall report to the joint
appropriations committee and the select committee on school
facilities any findings and recommendations as a result of
this study and shall include any proposed statutory
amendments necessary to operationalize direct expenditures
by the state construction department for major building and
facility repair and replacement for all K-12 public school
facilities.
6

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0259
ENROLLED ACT NO. 75, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become a law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
7